Maine, session 132, LD1786.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2660-Z is enacted to read:
§2660-Z. Information regarding PFAS; private drinking water wells
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection.
B. "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means a perfluoroalkyl
substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance that is detectable in drinking water using
standard laboratory methods established by the United States Environmental Protection
Agency, including regulated PFAS contaminants.
C. "Regulated PFAS contaminants" means:
(1) The specific PFAS compounds regulated pursuant to the drinking water
standards adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance
with Resolve 2021, chapter 82; or
(2) If maximum contaminant levels for PFAS are adopted by the Department of
Health and Human Services subsequent to the adoption of the drinking water
standards described in subparagraph (1), the specific PFAS compounds regulated
pursuant to those maximum contaminant levels.
2. Posting of information regarding maximum contaminant levels for PFAS. The
department shall post on its publicly accessible website information regarding the most
stringent maximum contaminant levels adopted by a federal agency or the State for
regulated PFAS contaminants, measured in parts per trillion, that are in effect at the time
the information is posted and update the information whenever a maximum contaminant
level is changed.
Page 1 - 132LR2311(03)

3. Provision of information to owner of private drinking water well tested for
PFAS contamination. If the department conducts or facilitates the testing of a private
drinking water well for potential PFAS contamination, it shall provide to the owner of the
well, by mail and, if possible, by e-mail, the following information at the time that it
provides the owner with the results of that testing:
A. Information regarding the most stringent maximum contaminant levels adopted by
a federal agency or the State for regulated PFAS contaminants, measured in parts per
trillion, that are in effect at the time of the testing;
B. A comparison of the testing results to the most stringent maximum contaminant
levels adopted by a federal agency or the State for regulated PFAS contaminants,
measured in parts per trillion, that are in effect at the time of the testing; and
C. Information regarding resources available to owners of private drinking water wells
affected by PFAS contamination, including information regarding available mitigation
strategies for PFAS in private drinking water wells, information regarding entities that
test for PFAS in private drinking water wells and information regarding financial
assistance, if available, from state, federal and local governments and other sources to
support testing and mitigation of PFAS in private drinking water wells.
4. Provision of information to other private drinking water well owners. If the
department has not conducted or facilitated the testing of a private drinking water well for
potential PFAS contamination, the department shall provide to the owner of the private
drinking water well, by mail and, if possible, by e-mail, the information under subsection
3, paragraphs A and C if the department has knowledge that the well may be contaminated
by PFAS or if the owner requests such information by telephone, in writing or by e-mail.
Page 2 - 132LR2311(03)